Tennessee, session 114, HB1767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
67-6-359.
(a) There is exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter the retail sale of food
and food ingredients, as defined in § 67-6-102, if sold to a member of an eligible family.
(b)
(1) An eligible family that is seeking the exemption provided under this
section must submit an application for exemption to the commissioner of
revenue, providing proof of eligibility that may be evidenced by submitting with
the application a copy of the most recent federal income tax return as reported
on form 1040. The application must be submitted on forms prescribed by the
commissioner.
(2) If the exemption is approved by the commissioner, then the
department of revenue shall issue a sales and use tax exemption certificate and
wallet-sized card, which may be made of paper, to the applicant that declares
that the applicant is entitled to the exemption provided by this section.
(3) An eligible family that has obtained an exemption certificate and card
issued by the department shall present the card to a retailer or provide the
retailer with a copy of the certificate of exemption, which must include the
exemption account number included on the certificate issued by the
HB1767
011172
- 1 -

commissioner. The retailer shall record the exemption account number and
maintain a copy of such exemption in the retailer's records to document that the
purchaser was entitled to the exemption.
(c) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Eligible family" means a family with:
(A) An annual household income that does not exceed three
hundred percent (300%) of the amount required for a student to qualify for
free or reduced price lunch, as provided in the income eligibility guidelines
published by the United States department of agriculture's food and
nutrition service; and
(B) A qualifying child or qualifying relative, as those terms are
defined in § 152 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 152), claimed
as a dependent for federal income tax purposes.
SECTION 2. For purposes of promulgating rules and forms, this act takes effect upon
becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July
1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011172